tables/ru-litbrl.ctb
# 2010 manual, 2.5 rule 3: rewrite only a numeric parenthesized period to
# internal characters. They emit upper-row digits without triggering another
# number sign. F55A also prevents the comma in 1,(523) from becoming endnum.
noback correct _$D["("]$D.")" "\xf55b"#8=1
noback correct _$D[",("]$D.")" "\xf55a\xf55b"#8=1
noback correct #8=1["0"] "\xf560"
noback correct #8=1["1"] "\xf561"
noback correct #8=1["2"] "\xf562"
noback correct #8=1["3"] "\xf563"
noback correct #8=1["4"] "\xf564"
noback correct #8=1["5"] "\xf565"
noback correct #8=1["6"] "\xf566"
noback correct #8=1["7"] "\xf567"
noback correct #8=1["8"] "\xf568"
noback correct #8=1["9"] "\xf569"
noback correct #8=1[")"] ")"#8=0

# Mark letters immediately following digits.
noback context _$d[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1              # uppercase cyrillic letter following digit: 45
noback context _$d[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0               # lowercase cyrillic letter following digit: 5
noback context _$d[]%upperlatin @46#1=1#2=1                 # uppercase latin letter following digit: 46
noback context _$d[]%lowerlatin @6#1=1#2=0                  # lowercase latin letter following digit: 6
noback context _$d[]%uppergreek @456#1=2#2=1                # lowercase greek letter following digit: 456
noback context _$d[]%lowergreek @56#1=2#2=0                 # lowercase greek letter following digit: 56

# Mark letters immediately following dollar sign.
noback context _"$"[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0              # lowercase cyrillic letter following dollar sign: 5
noback context _"$"[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1             # uppercase cyrillic letter following dollar sign: 45
noback context _"$"[]%lowerlatin @6#1=1#2=0                 # lowercase latin letter following dollar sign: 6
noback context _"$"[]%upperlatin @46#1=1#2=1                # lowercase latin letter following dollar sign: 46
noback context _"$"[]%lowergreek @56#1=2#2=0                # lowercase greek letter following dollar sign: 56
noback context _"$"[]%uppergreek @456#1=2#2=1               # uppercase greek letter following dollar sign: 456

# Mark latin letters where it is required.
noback context !#1=1[]%lowerlatin @6#1=1#2=0                # lowercase latin letter when not in latin mode: 6
noback context !#1=1[]%upperlatin @46#1=1#2=1               # uppercase latin letter when not in latin mode: 46

# Mark greek letters where it is required.
noback context !#1=2[]%lowergreek @56#1=2#2=0               # lowercase greek letter when not in Greek mode: 56
noback context !#1=2[]%uppergreek @456#1=2#2=1              # uppercase greek letter when not in Greek mode: 456

# Mark cyrillic letters immediately following latins and greeks.
noback context _%upperlatin[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1     # uppercase cyrillic letter following latin letter: 45
noback context _%lowerlatin[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1
noback context _%uppergreek[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1     # uppercase cyrillic letter following greek letter: 45
noback context _%lowergreek[]%uppercyrillic @45#1=0#2=1
noback context _%upperlatin[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0      # lowercase cyrillic letter following latin letter: 5
noback context _%lowerlatin[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0
noback context _%uppergreek[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0      # lowercase cyrillic letter following greek letter: 5
noback context _%lowergreek[]%lowercyrillic @5#1=0#2=0

# Enter cyrillic mode
noback context !#1=0[]%lowercyrillic #1=0#2=0
noback context !#1=0[]%uppercyrillic #1=0#2=1

# Move accent marks before accented letters according to the Russian braille standard
noback correct [$l]"\x00b4" "\x00b4"*
noback correct [$l]"\x02c6" "\x02c6"*
noback correct [$l]"\x02ca" "\x02ca"*
noback correct [$l]"\x02dd" "\x02dd"*
noback correct [$l]"\x0300" "\x0300"*
noback correct [$l]"\x0301" "\x0301"*
noback correct [$l]"\x0302" "\x0302"*
noback correct [$l]"\x030b" "\x030b"*
noback correct [$l]"\x0317" "\x0317"*
noback correct [$l]"\x032d" "\x032d"*
noback correct [$l]"\x0341" "\x0341"*

# Format dialogs and direct speech according to the Russian braille tradition.
noback pass2 `$s.@36 *#3=1               # direct speech is started with dash-symbol
noback pass2 `@36 *#3=1               # direct speech is started with dash-symbol
noback pass2 @236 *#3=1               # direct speech is started with quotation mark
noback pass2 @356 *#3=0               # direct speech ends with quotation mark
noback pass2 #3=1@2@36@0 *#3=2               # author's words in the middle of direct speech after comma
noback pass2 #3=1@26@36@0 *#3=2               # author's words in the middle of direct speech after question mark
noback pass2 #3=1@235@36@0 *#3=2               # author's words in the middle of direct speech after exclamation mark
noback pass2 #3=2@2[@36@0] @0-36#3=1               # direct speech continues after comma
noback pass2 #3=2@256[@36@0] @0-36#3=1               # direct speech continues after dot

# Mark punctuations after fractions
noback	context	%fractions[]$p	@6

# Remove dot 6 before period after digits when numerating items of a numbered list
noback correct `$s.$D.["."] "\x2832"
noback correct `$D.["."] "\x2832"

# Correct right single quotation mark when it's used as an apostrophe
noback correct "\x2018" *#7=1
noback correct #7=0"\x2019" "'"

# Back translation of letters

# Cyrillic uppercase letters
nofor context [@45-45] #4=2			# Input several Cyrillic uppercase letters
nofor context [@45] #4=1			# Input a Cyrillic uppercase letter

nofor context #4=1@1 "А"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@12 "Б"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@2456 "В"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1245 "Г"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@145 "Д"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@15 "Е"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@16 "Ё"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@245 "Ж"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1356 "З"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@24 "И"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@12346 "Й"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@13 "К"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@123 "Л"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@134 "М"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1345 "Н"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@135 "О"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1234 "П"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1235 "Р"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@234 "С"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@2345 "Т"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@136 "У"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@124 "Ф"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@125 "Х"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@14 "Ц"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@12345 "Ч"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@156 "Ш"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1346 "Щ"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@12356 "Ъ"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@2346 "Ы"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@23456 "Ь"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@246 "Э"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1256 "Ю"#4=0
nofor context #4=1@1246 "Я"#4=0

nofor context #4=2@1 "А"
nofor context #4=2@12 "Б"
nofor context #4=2@2456 "В"
nofor context #4=2@1245 "Г"
nofor context #4=2@145 "Д"
nofor context #4=2@15 "Е"
nofor context #4=2@16 "Ё"
nofor context #4=2@245 "Ж"
nofor context #4=2@1356 "З"
nofor context #4=2@24 "И"
nofor context #4=2@12346 "Й"
nofor context #4=2@13 "К"
nofor context #4=2@123 "Л"
nofor context #4=2@134 "М"
nofor context #4=2@1345 "Н"
nofor context #4=2@135 "О"
nofor context #4=2@1234 "П"
nofor context #4=2@1235 "Р"
nofor context #4=2@234 "С"
nofor context #4=2@2345 "Т"
nofor context #4=2@136 "У"
nofor context #4=2@124 "Ф"
nofor context #4=2@125 "Х"
nofor context #4=2@14 "Ц"
nofor context #4=2@12345 "Ч"
nofor context #4=2@156 "Ш"
nofor context #4=2@1346 "Щ"
nofor context #4=2@12356 "Ъ"
nofor context #4=2@2346 "Ы"
nofor context #4=2@23456 "Ь"
nofor context #4=2@246 "Э"
nofor context #4=2@1256 "Ю"
nofor context #4=2@1246 "Я"

nofor context !#4=0[!%uppercyrillic] *#4=0

# Latin letters
nofor context [@6] #5=1			# Input a Latin lowercase letter

nofor context #5=1@1 "a"
nofor context #5=1@12 "b"
nofor context #5=1@14 "c"
nofor context #5=1@145 "d"
nofor context #5=1@15 "e"
nofor context #5=1@124 "f"
nofor context #5=1@1245 "g"
nofor context #5=1@125 "h"
nofor context #5=1@24 "i"
nofor context #5=1@245 "j"
nofor context #5=1@13 "k"
nofor context #5=1@123 "l"
nofor context #5=1@134 "m"
nofor context #5=1@1345 "n"
nofor context #5=1@135 "o"
nofor context #5=1@1234 "p"
nofor context #5=1@12345 "q"
nofor context #5=1@1235 "r"
nofor context #5=1@234 "s"
nofor context #5=1@2345 "t"
nofor context #5=1@136 "u"
nofor context #5=1@1236 "v"
nofor context #5=1@2456 "w"
nofor context #5=1@1346 "x"
nofor context #5=1@13456 "y"
nofor context #5=1@1356 "z"
nofor context #5=1@345 "\x00e4"
nofor context #5=1@246 "\x00f6"
nofor context #5=1@1256 "\x00fc"

nofor context [@46] #5=2			# Input an uppercase Latin letter

nofor context #5=2@1 "A"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@12 "B"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@14 "C"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@145 "D"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@15 "E"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@124 "F"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1245 "G"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@125 "H"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@24 "I"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@245 "J"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@13 "K"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@123 "L"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@134 "M"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1345 "N"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@135 "O"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1234 "P"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@12345 "Q"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1235 "R"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@234 "S"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@2345 "T"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@136 "U"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1236 "V"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@2456 "W"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1346 "X"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@13456 "Y"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1356 "Z"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@345 "\x00c4"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@246 "\x00d6"#5=1
nofor context #5=2@1256 "\x00dc"#5=1

attribute allowLatinMode ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz\x00c4\x00d6\x00dc\x00e4\x00f6\x00fc'&`
nofor context !#5=0@0 "\s"#5=0
nofor context !#5=0[!%allowLatinMode] *#5=0

# Greek letters (lowercase only)
nofor context [@56] #6=1			# Input a lowercase Greek letter

nofor context #6=1@1 "\x03B1"
nofor context #6=1@12 "\x03B2"
nofor context #6=1@1245 "\x03B3"
nofor context #6=1@145 "\x03B4"
nofor context #6=1@15 "\x03B5"
nofor context #6=1@1356 "\x03B6"
nofor context #6=1@245 "\x03B7"
nofor context #6=1@125 "\x03B8"
nofor context #6=1@24 "\x03B9"
nofor context #6=1@13 "\x03BA"
nofor context #6=1@123 "\x03BB"
nofor context #6=1@134 "\x03BC"
nofor context #6=1@1345 "\x03BD"
nofor context #6=1@1346 "\x03BE"
nofor context #6=1@135 "\x03BF"
nofor context #6=1@1234 "\x03C0"
nofor context #6=1@1235 "\x03C1"
nofor context #6=1@234 "\x03C3"
nofor context #6=1@2345 "\x03C4"
nofor context #6=1@136 "\x03C5"
nofor context #6=1@124 "\x03C6"
nofor context #6=1@14 "\x03C7"
nofor context #6=1@13456 "\x03C8"
nofor context #6=1@2456 "\x03C9"
nofor context #6=1[!%lowergreek] *#6=0

include braille-patterns.cti
include IPA-unicode-range.uti
